Maryland, session 2025, SB0130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0130*

SENATE BILL 130
Article – Education
4–147.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CELLULAR DEVICE” MEANS ANY PORTABLE, WIRELESS
COMMUNICATION DEVICE, INCLUDING A SMARTPHONE, TABLET, OR WEARABLE
DEVICE.
(3) “INSTRUCTIONAL TIME” MEANS ANY TIME DURING THE SCHOOL
DAY, EXCEPT A STUDENT’S LUNCH PERIOD.
(B) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY TO
PROHIBIT THE USE OF A CELLULAR DEVICE BY STUDENTS DURING INSTRUCTIONAL
TIME.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE
POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING A CELLULAR DEVICE DURING
INSTRUCTIONAL TIME; AND
(2) REQUIRE A STUDENT TO STORE THE STUDENT’S CELLULAR
DEVICE IN A SECURE STORAGE CONTAINER.
(D) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT PROHIBIT A
STUDENT FROM USING A CELLULAR DEVICE:
(1) FOR ANY PURPOSE DOCUMENTED IN A STUDENT’S
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR SECTION 504 PLAN;
(2) TO MONITOR OR ADDRESS A STUDENT’S HEALTH ISSUE THAT HAS
BEEN DOCUMENTED BY A LICENSED MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL; OR
(3) FOR EDUCATION PURPOSES WHEN DIRECTED BY AN EDUCATOR
OR ADMINISTRATOR.
(E) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE
APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR VIOLATIONS OF THE POLICY.

SENATE BILL 130 3
(F) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL NOTIFY STUDENTS, PARENTS AND
GUARDIANS, AND SCHOOL PERSONNEL OF THE POLICY DEVELOPED AND
IMPLEMENTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE” MEANS ANY
PORTABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE FOR INDIVIDUAL USE, INCLUDING A SMARTPHONE,
TABLET, LAPTOP, SMARTWATCH, OR ANY OTHER ELECTRONIC DEVICE THAT IS
CAPABLE OF CONNECTING TO A SMARTPHONE OR A CELLULAR OR WI–FI NETWORK.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION WITH STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL
DEVELOP GUIDELINES FOR A POLICY ON STUDENT USE OF PERSONAL ELECTRONIC
DEVICES DURING SCHOOL HOURS, INCLUDING:
(1) MODEL POLICY OPTIONS FOR COUNTY BOARDS TO USE IN THE
DEVELOPMENT OF A POLICY;
(2) CONSIDERATIONS FOR STUDENTS IN DIFFERENT GRADE LEVELS;
(3) CONSIDERATIONS FOR LEGAL EXEMPTIONS AND
ACCOMMODATIONS FOR STUDENTS; AND
(4) RECOMMENDATIONS ON THE LIMITATION OF STUDENT USE OF
PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICES DURING SCHOOL HOURS.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION WITH STAKEHOLDERS,
MAY PERIODICALLY UPDATE THE GUIDELINES DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) COLLECT INFORMATION ON EACH COUNTY BOARD’S
PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE USE POLICY; AND
(II) USE THE INFORMATION COLLECTED TO DEVELOP BEST
PRACTICES AND INFORM THE PERIODIC REVIEW OF THE GUIDELINES.
(D) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH PARENTS,
TEACHERS, STUDENTS, AND SCHOOL PERSONNEL, SHALL DEVELOP AND ADOPT A
POLICY THAT LIMITS A STUDENT FROM USING A PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE
DURING SCHOOL HOURS.
(2) THE POLICY ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE EXCEPTIONS:

SENATE BILL 130
1. FOR ANY PURPOSE DOCUMENTED IN A STUDENT’S
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR SECTION 504 PLAN;
2. TO MONITOR OR ADDRESS A STUDENT’S
DOCUMENTED HEALTH ISSUE; OR
3. WHEN DIRECTED BY AN EDUCATOR OR
ADMINISTRATOR FOR EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES;
(II) BE PRINTED IN THE STUDENT HANDBOOK;
(III) BE PROVIDED TO SCHOOL STAFF AND PERSONNEL; AND
(IV) BE REVIEWED AND UPDATED EVERY 2 YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.